Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Sales, Mortgages, and Leases
[Repealed]

§§ 77-9-461 through 77-9-467.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 512, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Codes, 1880, § 1033; 1892, § 3567; 1906, §§ 4067, 4103-4105; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6696, 6732-6734; 1930, §§ 6099, 6101-6103; 1942, §§ 7751, 7753-7755; Laws, 1910, ch. 212]